Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 249.006 is amended to read:
249.006. (1) Immediately upon [ filing] being filed , a nominating petition, declaration of candi-
dacy, withdrawal, certificate of nomination or other document required to be filed under this chapter
[shall] must be dated and time stamped by the filing officer.
(2) Not more than five business days after a declaration  of candidacy is filed under sub-
section (1) of this section, a county elections official or city  elections officer shall make the
name of the candidate and the office for which the candidate filed to be a candidate publicly
available on the website for the county or city.
(3) Not more than two business days  after a candidate is determined by a county
elections official or city elections officer to be eligible to be a candidate, the county elections
official or city elections officer shall make the declaration of candidacy  filed by the candidate
under subsection (1) of this section publicly available on the website for the county or city.
This subsection does not apply  to any declaration of candidacy filed by a candidate for pre-
cinct committeeperson.
(4) Not more than two business  days after a withdrawal is filed under subsection (1) of
this section, a county elections official or city elections officer shall make the withdrawal
publicly available on the website for the county or city.
(5)(a) If a county elections official or city elections officer  does not make the information
described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section publicly available  on the website for the
county or  city, a person may request the information from the county elections official or
city elections officer. The county elections official or city elections officer shall provide  the
information requested under this paragraph to the person  not more than five business days
after the official or officer receives the request.
(b) A county elections official or city elections officer may charge and collect a fee  from
a person who submits a request under paragraph  (a) of this subsection if the person requests
a physical copy of the information.
(c) A county elections official or city elections officer may not charge or collect a  fee
from a person who submits a  request under paragraph (a) of this subsection if the person
requests a digital copy of the information or if the person requests only to inspect  the in-
formation at the elections office.
Enrolled Senate Bill 580 (SB 580-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate May 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 580 (SB 580-A) Page 2